Hawaii statutes.
§432:1-608 Hospice care coverage. (a)
Any other law to the contrary notwithstanding, commencing on January 1, 2000,
all mutual benefit societies issuing or renewing an individual and group
hospital or medical service plan, policy, contract, or agreement in this State
that provides for payment of or reimbursement for hospice care shall reimburse
hospice care services for each insured member covered for hospice care
according to the following:

(1) A minimum daily rate as set by the Centers for
Medicare and Medicaid Services for hospice care;

(2) Reimbursement for residential hospice room and
board expenses directly related to the hospice care being provided; and

(3) Reimbursement for each hospice referral visit
during which a patient is advised of hospice care options, regardless of
whether the referred patient is eventually admitted to hospice care.

(b) Every insurer shall provide notice to its
members regarding the coverage required by this section. Notice shall be in
writing and in literature or correspondence sent to members, beginning with
calendar year 2000, along with any other mailing to members, but in no case
later than July 1, 2000. [L 1999, c 77, §5; am L 2011, c 43, §17]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next